Utah statutes.
78A-6-1108.   New hearings authorized -- Grounds and procedure.

(1)  A parent, guardian, or custodian of any child adjudicated under this chapter, or any minor who is at least 18 years old, or adult affected by a decree in a proceeding under this chapter, may at any time petition the court for a new hearing on the ground that new evidence which was not known and could not with due diligence have been made available at the original hearing and which might affect the decree, has been discovered.

(2)  If it appears to the court that there is new evidence which might affect its decree, it shall order a new hearing, enter a decree, and make any disposition of the case warranted by all the facts and circumstances and the best interests of the minor.

(3)  This section does not apply to a minor's case handled under the provisions of Section 78A-6-702.

